Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-204
Election Administration Fund; created; use; investment.

The Election Administration Fund is hereby created. The fund shall consist of federal funds, state funds, gifts, and grants appropriated for the administration of elections. The Secretary of State shall use the fund for voting systems, provisional voting, computerized statewide voter registration lists, voter registration, training or informational materials related to elections, and any other costs related to elections. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The State Treasurer shall transfer any funds in the Carbon Sequestration Assessment Cash Fund on August 24, 2017, to the Election Administration Fund.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 24;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 29;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 13;

Laws 2003, LB 14, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB661, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB644, § 3.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.